Hawaii statutes.
§206-3 Interested members, officers or
employees. No member of the board of land and natural resources or officer
or employee administering this chapter shall acquire any interest, direct or
indirect, in any development project or in any property included or planned to
be included in any development project other than by gift, devise, or
inheritance; nor shall the member, officer, or employee have or acquire any
interest, direct or indirect, in the financing of any development project or in
any contract or proposed contract for materials or services to be furnished or
used in connection with or relating to any development project. If any member,
officer, or employee has or acquires an interest, by gift, devise, or
inheritance, direct or indirect, in any development project or in any property
included or planned to be included in any development project, the member,
officer, or employee shall immediately disclose the same in writing to the
board and the disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the board; and
the member, officer, or employee shall dispose of the interest within six
months of the acquisition or initiation of the project, whichever shall last
occur. The member, officer, or employee shall not participate in any action by
the board relating to the property, project, or contract in which the member,
officer, or employee has or acquires any interest. Violation of this section
shall constitute, in case of the member or officer, misconduct in office or, in
case of an employee, cause for dismissal. [L 1961, c 6, §4; Supp, §98J-4; HRS
§206-3; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next